Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4484.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 156.1, as
last amended by Section 55, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 156.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 156.1. A. It shall be unlawful for any state official,
officer or employee, except any essential employees approved by the
Governor and those officers or employees authorized in subsection B
of this section, to ride to or from the place of residence of the
employee in a state-owned or state-leased automobile, truck or
pickup, except in the performance of the official duty of the
employee, or to use or permit the use of any such automobile, truck,
ambulance or pickup for other personal or private purposes. Any
person convicted of violating the provisions of this section shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not
more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment in the
county jail for a period to not exceed thirty (30) days, or by both
said fine and imprisonment, and in addition thereto, shall be
discharged from state employment.

B. 1. Any state employee, other than the individuals provided
for in paragraph 2 of this subsection and any employee of the
Department of Public Safety who is a wrecker inspector or auditor of
the Wrecker Services Division as provided for in paragraph 3 of this
subsection, who receives emergency telephone calls regularly at the
residence of the employee when the employee is not on duty and is
regularly called upon to use a vehicle after normal work hours in
response to such emergency calls, may be permitted to use a vehicle
belonging to the state to provide transportation between the
residence of the employee and the assigned place of employment,
provided such distance does not exceed seventy-five (75) miles in
any round trip or is within the county where the assigned place of
employment is located. Provided further, an employee may be
permitted to use a state-owned or state-leased vehicle to provide
temporary transportation between a specific work location other than
the assigned place of employment and the residence of the employee,
if such use shall result in a monetary saving to the agency, and
such authorization shall not be subject to the distance or area
restrictions provided for in this paragraph. Authorization for
temporary use of a state-owned or state-leased vehicle for a
specific project shall be in writing stating the justification for
this use and the saving expected to result. Such authorization
shall be valid for not to exceed sixty (60) days. Any state entity
other than law enforcement that avails itself of this provision
shall keep a monthly record of all participating employees, the
number of emergency calls received and the number of times that a
state vehicle was used in the performance of such emergency calls.
2. Any employee of the Department of Public Safety, Oklahoma
Department of Corrections, Office of the Attorney General, Oklahoma
State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control, Oklahoma
State Bureau of Investigation, Alcoholic Beverage Laws Enforcement
Commission, Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission, Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, Office of the Inspector General
within the Department of Human Services or Office of the State Fire
Marshal, who is a law enforcement officer or criminalist, Public
Information officer, Special Investigator or Assistant Director of
the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, the Executive Director
of CLEET, CLEET-certified Investigator for a state board or any
employee of a district attorney who is a law enforcement officer,
may be permitted to use a state-owned or state-leased vehicle to
provide transportation between the residence of the employee and the
assigned place of employment and between the residence and any
location other than the assigned place of employment to which the
ENR. H. B. NO. 4484 Page 2

employee travels in the performance of the official duty of the
employee.
3. Any employee of the Department of Public Safety who is a
wrecker inspector or auditor of the Wrecker Services Division, or a
noncommissioned pilot, may be permitted, as determined by the
Commissioner, to use a state-owned or state-leased vehicle to
provide transportation between the residence of the employee and the
assigned place of employment and between the residence and any
location other than the assigned place of employment to which the
employee travels in the performance of the official duty of the
employee.
4. The Director, department heads and other essential employees
of the Department of Wildlife Conservation, as authorized by the
Wildlife Conservation Commission, may be permitted to use a state-
owned or state-leased vehicle to provide transportation between the
residence of the employee and the assigned place of employment and
between the residence and any location other than the assigned place
of employment to which the employee travels in the performance of
the official duty of the employee.
5. The Director, department heads, emergency responders and
other essential employees of the Department of Corrections, as
authorized by the Director, may be permitted to use a state-owned or
state-leased vehicle to provide transportation between the residence
of the employee and the assigned place of employment and between the
residence and any location other than the assigned place of
employment to which the employee travels in the performance of the
official duty of the employee.
6. Designated Examiner Auditors, Designated Examiner
Supervisors, Commercial Driver License Examiners, Commercial Driver
License Auditors, Commercial Driver License Supervisors, and Driver
License Supervisors, as an employee of Service Oklahoma, may be
permitted, as determined by the Director of Service Oklahoma, to use
a state-owned or state-leased vehicle to provide transportation
between the residence of the employee and the assigned place of
employment and between the residence and any location other than the
assigned place.
7. The Attorney General, division heads, emergency responders,
agents, assistant attorneys general, and other essential employees
of the Office of the Attorney General, as authorized by the Attorney
General, may be permitted to use a state-owned or state-leased
ENR. H. B. NO. 4484 Page 3

vehicle to provide transportation between the residence of the
employee and the assigned place of employment and between the
residence and any location other than the assigned place of
employment to which the employee travels in the performance of the
official duty of the employee.
8. The Corporation Commissioners, division heads, emergency
responders, and field inspectors working assigned areas and not
stationed at a central office, as authorized by the Corporation
Commission, may be permitted to use a state-owned or state-leased
vehicle to provide transportation between the residence of the
employee and the assigned place of employment and between the
residence and any location other than the assigned place of
employment to which the employee travels in the performance of the
official duty of the employee.
C. The principal administrator of the state agency with which
the employee is employed shall so designate the status of the
employee in writing or provide a copy of the temporary authorization
to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Oklahoma State
Senate and the Speaker of the Oklahoma House of Representatives.
Such employee status report shall also be provided to the State
Fleet Manager of the Division of Fleet Management if the motor
vehicle for emergency use is provided by said Division.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 4484 Page 4

Passed the House of Representatives the 11th day of March, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 5th day of May, 2026.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 4484 Page 5